Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6368.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. Whether or not notes or bonds issued pursuant to under this act are within the definition of negotiable instruments under the applicable provisions of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, the notes or bonds shall be are negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all purposes of the provisions of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, subject only to the provisions of the notes or bonds for registration. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.